dev/apertium-far.far.dix
	<pardef n="onvan__n">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="vblex__v">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="vbser__v">
		<e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="vbser"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>			
		<e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vbser"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="vbser"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یم</l><r><s n="vbser"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ید</l><r><s n="vbser"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ند</l><r><s n="vbser"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	   
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="vbdo__v">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="vbdo"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="vbdo"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="vbdo"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
  
	<pardef n="pres__v">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>

	</pardef>
    <pardef n="past__v">
		<e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>	
		<e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>			
		<e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>یم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ید</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ند</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="felkomaki__v">
         <e><p><l/><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	

	<e lm="دوشیزه"><i>دوشیزه</i><par n="onvan__n"/></e>
	<e lm="خانم"><i>خانم</i><par n="onvan__n"/></e>
	<e lm="آقای"><i>آقای</i><par n="onvan__n"/></e>
	<e lm="پروفسور"><i>پروفسور</i><par n="onvan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="لیدی"><i>لیدی</i><par n="onvan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اعلی حضرت"><i>اعلی<b/>حضرت</i><par n="onvan__n"/></e>
	<e lm="مادام"><i>مادام</i><par n="onvan__n"/></e>
	<e lm="شاید"><i>شاید</i><par n="felkomaki__v"/></e>
    <e lm="باید"><i>باید</i><par n="felkomaki__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نباید"><i>نباید</i><par n="felkomaki__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="می‌توان"><i>می‌توان</i><par n="felkomaki__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نمی‌توان"><i>نمی‌توان</i><par n="felkomaki__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="سعی میکرد"><p><l>سعی<b/>میکرد</l><r>سعی<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="سرک می کشید"><p><l>می<b/>سرک<b/>می کشید</l><r>سرک<b/>کشید</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="گره می‌کرد"><p><l>گره<b/>می‌کرد</l><r>گره<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="جواب میداد"><p><l>جواب<b/>میداد</l><r>جواب<b/>داد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="لذت می برد"><p><l>می<b/>لذت<b/>می برد</l><r>لذت<b/>برد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="‌تأمل می‌کرد"><p><l>‌تأمل<b/>می‌کرد</l><r>‌تأمل<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="استفهام میکرد"><p><l>استفهام<b/>میکرد</l><r>استفهام<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="فرو می کرد"><p><l>می<b/>فرو<b/>می کرد</l><r>فرو<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="بیان می‌کرد"><p><l>بیان<b/>می‌کرد</l><r>بیان<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="واگذار میکرد"><p><l>واگذار<b/>میکرد</l><r>واگذار<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="می نالید"><p><l>می<b/>نالید</l><r>نالید</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="پیدا می‌شد"><p><l>پیدا<b/>می‌شد</l><r>پیدا<b/>شد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="یخ میزد"><p><l>یخ<b/>میزد</l><r>یخ<b/>زد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="شل می کرد"><p><l>می<b/>شل<b/>می کرد</l><r>شل<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="درخشان می‌شد"><p><l>درخشان<b/>می‌شد</l><r>درخشان<b/>شد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="فراموش میکرد"><p><l>فراموش<b/>میکرد</l><r>فراموش<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="توقف می کرد"><p><l>می<b/>توقف<b/>می کرد</l><r>توقف<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="بازگو می‌کرد"><p><l>بازگو<b/>می‌کرد</l><r>بازگو<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="متوقف میشد"><p><l>متوقف<b/>میشد</l><r>متوقف<b/>شد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="حس می کرد"><p><l>می<b/>حس<b/>می کرد</l><r>حس<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="بیرون میپرید"><p><l>بیرون<b/>میپرید</l><r>بیرون<b/>پرید</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="انجام می‌داد"><p><l>انجام<b/>می‌داد</l><r>انجام<b/>داد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نیست"><i>نیست</i><par n="vbser__v"/><par n="pres__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="هست"><i>هست</i><par n="vbser__v"/><par n="pres__v"/></e>
	<e lm="است"><i>است</i><par n="vbser__v"/><par n="pres__v"/></e>
	<e lm="بود"><i>بود</i><par n="vbser__v"/><par n="past__v"/></e>
	<e lm="شد"><i>شد</i><par n="vbser__v"/><par n="past__v"/></e>
	<e lm="گشت"><i>گشت</i><par n="vbser__v"/><par n="past__v"/></e>
	<e lm="گردید"><i>گردید</i><par n="vbser__v"/><par n="pres__v"/></e>
    <e lm="گرد"><i>گرد</i><par n="vbser__v"/><par n="pres__v"/></e>
	<e lm="پاک نمی‌کرد"><p><l>پاک<b/>نمی‌کرد</l><r>پاک<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نمیتوانست"><p><l>نمیتوانست</l><r>توانست</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نمی‌دانست"><p><l>نمی‌دانست</l><r>دانست</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نمی نهاد"><p><l>نمی<b/>نهاد</l><r>نهاد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نمیپوشید"><p><l>نمیپوشید</l><r>پوشید</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نمی‌مرد"><p><l>نمی‌مرد</l><r>مرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نمیکشت"><p><l>نمیکشت</l><r>کشت</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="جستجو نمی‌کرد"><p><l>جستجو<b/>نمی‌کرد</l><r>جستجو<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="می پیمود"><p><l>می<b/>پیمود</l><r>پیمود</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="می‌بالید"><p><l>می‌بالید</l><r>بالید</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="می ربایید"><p><l>می<b/>ربایید</l><r>ربایید</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="میگذاشت"><p><l>میگذاشت</l><r>گذاشت</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="به راه می‌افتاد"><p><l>به راه می‌افتاد</l><r>به راه افتاد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="میکوبید"><p><l>میکوبید</l><r>کوبید</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="قبول می‌کرد"><p><l>قبول<b/>می‌کرد</l><r>قبول<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="تکیه می کرد"><p><l>می<b/>تکیه<b/>می کرد</l><r>تکیه<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="مانع میشد"><p><l>مانع<b/>میشد</l><r>مانع<b/>شد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="فرار می‌کرد"><p><l>فرار<b/>می‌کرد</l><r>فرار<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="موافق می بود"><p><l>می<b/>موافق<b/>می بود</l><r>موافق<b/>بود</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="حضور میافت"><p><l>حضور<b/>میافت</l><r>حضور<b/>یافت</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="می‌پرستید"><p><l>می‌پرستید</l><r>پرستید</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="ناخالص می کرد"><p><l>می<b/>ناخالص<b/>می کرد</l><r>ناخالص<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/></e>
	<e lm="چرت نمی‌زد"><p><l>چرت<b/>نمی‌زد</l><r>چرت<b/>زد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="خاموش نمی کرد"><p><l>نمی<b/>خاموش<b/>نمی کرد</l><r>خاموش<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="ادامه نمی‌داشت"><p><l>ادامه<b/>نمی‌داشت</l><r>ادامه<b/>داشت</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="درک نمی‌کرد"><p><l>درک<b/>نمی‌کرد</l><r>درک<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نگاه نمیداشت"><p><l>نمی<b/>نگاه<b/>نمیداشت</l><r>نگاه<b/>داشت</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="تحمل نمیکرد"><p><l>تحمل<b/>نمیکرد</l><r>تحمل<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="آغاز نمی‌کرد"><p><l>آغاز<b/>نمی‌کرد</l><r>آغاز<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="تعلق نمیداشت"><p><l>نمی<b/>تعلق<b/>نمیداشت</l><r>تعلق<b/>داشت</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="پشتیبانی نمیکرد"><p><l>پشتیبانی<b/>نمیکرد</l><r>پشتیبانی<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="باور نمی‌کرد"><p><l>باور<b/>نمی‌کرد</l><r>باور<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="آتش نمی کرد"><p><l>نمی<b/>آتش<b/>نمی کرد</l><r>آتش<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="سوت نمیزد"><p><l>سوت<b/>نمیزد</l><r>سوت<b/>زد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
    <e lm="آیا"><i>آیا</i><par n="vbdo__v"/></e>
